California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(b) (1) Any individual applying for or continuing elective coverage under this section shall be requested to sign an annual statement authorizing the department to verify the net profit declared on his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE. Failure of the individual to sign a statement authorizing the department to verify income shall result in the individual being assigned an annual income level of four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) for contribution and benefit purposes.

(2) Any individual applying for elective coverage shall submit a copy of his or her Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE filed on or before April 15 of the preceding year with his or her application for elective coverage in order to establish first-year contributions and benefits in excess of the minimum required to qualify for elective coverage.

(c) Any self-employed individual continuing elective coverage who fails to file an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE by April 15 of each calendar year is required to remit contributions based upon the last year the self-employed individual filed an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE.

(d) Any self-employed individual who has not yet filed an Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE shall be assigned an annual income level of four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) for contribution and benefit purposes.

(e) Worker contributions required under this division are payable on and after the date stated in the approval of the director. The director may levy assessments under this division for any amount due when an elective coverage agreement has been in effect for less than two complete calendar years. Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701), relating to the collection of amounts due, shall apply to this section.

(f) No benefits shall be paid to any individual based on elective coverage income credits in his or her base period if his or her elective coverage agreement has been terminated under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 704.1.

(g) No benefits shall be paid to any individual based upon remuneration deemed to have been received pursuant to this section unless all contributions due with respect to all remuneration deemed to have been received by that individual pursuant to this section have been paid to the department.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2627, no benefits shall be paid to any individual covered under this section, with respect to periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1994, until he or she has been unemployed and disabled for a waiting period of seven consecutive days during each disability benefit period.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 2653, with respect to periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1994, the maximum amount of benefits payable to an individual covered under this section during any one disability benefit period shall be 39 times his or her weekly benefit amount, but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages credited to the individual during his or her disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(j) For purposes of this section, Internal Revenue Service Schedule SE is defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule SE, or in the case of statutory employees under the Internal Revenue Code, it shall be defined as Internal Revenue Service Form 1040 Schedule C, or the California Income Tax Return, when accompanied by Internal Revenue Service Form W-2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

Any local public entity located in this state specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 135 or Indian tribe specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 135 may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division with respect to all its employees, including those with civil service or tenure positions, and may file its written election with the director. That election may be made on its own motion by the appropriate governing board of the local public entity or Indian tribe making the election, or may be made by the governing board pursuant to a petition signed by a majority of the employees (including those with civil service or tenure positions) requesting the governing board to file an election with the director. Upon the filing of an election, the filing local public entity or Indian tribe shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees, including those with civil service or tenure positions, shall constitute employment subject to that part. Beginning at that time, it shall withhold from the wages of employees the contributions required for unemployment compensation disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 255, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable from December 21, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 17 of Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

(a) Any public entity or Indian tribe for which services that do constitute employment under Section 605 are performed and for which other services that do not constitute employment are performed may elect to become an employer subject to this part and Parts 3 (commencing with Section 3501) and 4 (commencing with Section 4001) of this division for not less than two calendar years with respect to those other services and to have those other services performed by its employees constitute employment subject to this part and Parts 3 and 4 for that period. Upon the filing of an election the filing public entity or Indian tribe shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to this part and Parts 3 and 4 with respect to the services covered to the same extent as other employers, and those services performed by its employees, including those with civil service or tenure positions, shall constitute employment subject to this part and Parts 3 and 4 effective on the first day of the calendar quarter following the quarter in which the election is filed.

(b) The public entity or Indian tribe may exclude from coverage under an election pursuant to this section any service excluded under Section 634.5.

(c) Any public entity or Indian tribe that has elected coverage under this section may elect any method of financing coverage otherwise permitted under Section 803 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 821), but the same method of financing coverage shall apply to all coverage by the public entity. An Indian tribe may make separate elections for itself and for each subdivision, subsidiary, or business enterprise wholly owned by that Indian tribe. Subdivision (b) of Section 802 shall apply to any election under Section 803, except that any election under Section 803 shall be terminated on the effective date of the termination of an election for coverage under this section.

(d) The director may require from the public entity or Indian tribe employment, financial, statistical, or other information and reports, properly verified, as may be deemed necessary by the director to carry out his or her duties under this division, which shall be filed with the director at the time and in the manner prescribed by him or her.

(e) The director may tabulate and publish information obtained pursuant to this section in statistical form and may divulge the name of the public entity or Indian tribe.

(f) The public entity or Indian tribe shall keep work records as prescribed by the director for the proper administration of this division.

(g) Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations shall apply to any matter arising pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 255, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable from December 21, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 17 of Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

710.4.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 709, any public school employer, as defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division, with respect to all employees who are a part of an appropriate unit established pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, provided such election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the public school employer and the certified employee organization, as such terms are defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code. The public school employer may elect to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees, as such terms are defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, and to employees not a part of an appropriate unit, but such election shall not be contingent upon coverage of other employees of the public school employer.

Upon filing of such an election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees, including those with civil service or tenure positions, shall constitute employment subject to such part. Beginning at that time, the public school employer shall withhold from the wages of employees the contributions required for unemployment compensation disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

710.5.

Notwithstanding Section 709, any public agency, as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code, may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) with respect to all employees who are a part of an appropriate unit established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, provided the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the public agency and the recognized employee organization, as those terms are defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code. The public agency employer also may elect to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees and to its employees who are not a part of an appropriate unit, but the election shall not be contingent upon coverage of other employees of the public agency employer.

Upon filing of such an election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees who are subject to an election under this section shall constitute employment subject to that part.

Sections 986 and 2903 shall apply to an employer making an election pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   Effective July 3, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

710.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 709, an Indian tribe as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code, including tribes not covered by the Tribal-State Gaming Compact, may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) with respect to all employees who meet either of the following conditions:

(1) Are employed in one or more distinct establishments or places of business.

(2) Are a part of an employee bargaining unit provided the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the Indian tribe and the recognized employee organization. The Indian tribe also may elect
 to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees and to its employees who are not a part of an employee bargaining unit, but the election by the bargaining unit shall not be contingent upon coverage of other employees of the Indian tribe.

(b) Upon filing of an election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees who are subject to an election under this section shall constitute employment subject to that part. Sections 986 and 2903 apply to an employer making an election pursuant to this section.

(c) This section does not affect the requirement that Indian tribes covered by the Tribal-State Gaming Compact be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 511.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

710.7.

(a) The State of California, as defined as an employer in Section 3513 of the Government Code, may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) with respect to all employees who are part of an appropriate unit established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, provided the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the State of California and the recognized employee organization, as those terms are defined in Section 3513 of the Government Code. The State of California may elect to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees and to its employees who are not part of an appropriate unit, provided that the election is not contingent upon coverage of other employees of the State of California.

(b) Upon filing of the election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees including those with civil service or tenure positions who are subject to an election under this section shall constitute employment subject to that part.

(c) Sections 986 and 2903 apply to an employer making an election pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

710.8.

(a) (1) The Trustees of the California State University, as defined as an employer in Section 3562 of the Government Code, shall elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) with respect to all employees who are part of an appropriate unit established pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, provided the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the Trustees of the California State University and a recognized employee organization of the university, as those terms are defined in Section 3562 of the Government Code, or is approved through an election held by a recognized employee organization of the university in accordance with the election procedures set forth in subdivision (d) of this section.

(2) The Trustees of the California State University may also elect to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees and to its employees who are not a part of an appropriate unit, provided that the election is not contingent upon coverage of other employees of the Trustees of the California State University.

(b) Upon filing of the election, the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees, including those with civil service or tenure positions, who are subject to an election under this section shall constitute employment subject to that part.

(c) Sections 986 and 2903 apply to an employer making an election pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) Upon an affirmative vote of the governing body of the employee organization, that governing body shall order that an election shall be conducted by secret ballot, placing on the ballot the question of whether the employees of that appropriate bargaining unit do or do not desire that the Trustees of the California State University shall become the employer of the employees of that appropriate bargaining unit for the purposes of being subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601).

(2) The recognized employee organization of the California State University shall certify the results of the election on the basis of which ballot choice receives a majority of the valid votes cast. There shall be printed on the ballot two choices, one which specifies the desire to be covered by state disability insurance and one which specifies the desire to continue to be covered by nonindustrial disability insurance.

(3) The ballot shall present the questions in a manner that stipulates that, if the election determination is in favor of the employees’ desire to be covered by state disability insurance, this determination is intended to supplant the nonindustrial disability insurance program provided for in Article 1.2 (commencing with Section 89529.15) of Chapter 5 of Part 55 of the Education Code, after two calendar quarters have elapsed following the effective date of the state disability insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 841, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

710.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 709, a community college district established pursuant to Part 43 (commencing with Section 70900) of Division 7 of the Education Code may elect to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) with respect to all employees who are part of an appropriate unit established pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, if the election is the result of a negotiated agreement between the community college district and the certified employee organization, as that term is defined in subdivision (b) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code. The community college district employer may also elect to provide coverage to its management and confidential employees and to its employees who are
 not part of an appropriate unit, but the election shall not be contingent upon coverage of other employees of the community college district employer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a community college district established pursuant to Part 43 (commencing with Section 70900) of Division 7 of the Education Code that employs an academic employee, as defined in Section 87001 of the Education Code, may elect to provide coverage to permanent, part-time, or temporary academic employees, including permanent, part-time, temporary, or substitute faculty or instructors, but the election shall not be contingent upon coverage of other academic employees of the community college district employer.

(b) Upon the filing of an election pursuant to subdivision (a), the filing entity shall, upon approval by the director, become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) to the
 same extent as other employers, and services performed by its employees who are subject to an election under this section shall constitute employment subject to that part.

(c) Sections 986 and 2903 shall apply to an employer making an election pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   (AB 381)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

No election filed by any public entity, as defined by Section 605, under any provision of this division shall be effective for service performed after December 31, 1977, and included in “employment” pursuant to Section 605, except that elections approved under subdivision (b) of former Section 710 as in effect prior to January 1, 1978, shall continue in effect as of such date with respect to disability insurance coverage for those employee classifications that are exempt from civil service or merit system status who perform work equivalent to those employees of the building trades crafts that are covered by collective-bargaining agreements with respect to wages, hours, fringe benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment. No election filed by any nonprofit organization under any provision of this division shall be effective for service performed after December 31, 1977, and included in “employment” pursuant to Section 608. All such elections for coverage filed prior to January 1, 1978, shall be terminated effective December 31, 1977, except as otherwise provided by this section and except that elections to reimburse benefits shall continue in effect, subject to Section 803, unless terminated by the public entity or nonprofit organization, and it shall remain liable for its proportionate share of the additional cost of benefits paid, or of the cost of benefits (including extended duration benefits and federal-state extended benefits) paid and charged to its account in the manner provided by Section 1026 which are based on wages paid for services during the period of any election for reimbursement of benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

To the extent permitted by federal law, no contributions shall be due from any nonprofit organization organized before 1960 which received a retroactive determination after April 1, 1981, and before April 1, 1982, that it has been a nonprofit organization from the date it was organized, which made contributions with respect to service performed in its employ prior to January 1, 1982, and which elected a method of financing and elected to use prior contributions until the additional cost of benefits reimbursable by or the cost of benefits paid and reimbursable by the nonprofit organization together with the benefits charged and chargeable to the reserve account of the nonprofit organization as the result of its prior elective coverage agreement exceed the contributions made by the nonprofit organization and credited to its reserve account pursuant to its prior elective coverage agreement.

This section shall apply only to organizations which make the elections described in this section within 120 days of the time they are legally able to do so because of a change in federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

To the extent permitted by federal law, no contributions shall be due from any nonprofit organization which first became compulsorily subject to this part on January 1, 1978, by reason of the enactment of the federal “Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1976” (Public Law 94-566) and the amendment to Section 634.5 by the 1978 portion of the 1977–78 Regular Session, which elects a method of financing under Section 803 when such election first becomes available, but not later than April 1, 1978, and which also elects to use contributions paid pursuant to an elective coverage agreement of such nonprofit organization in effect prior to January 1, 1978, until the cost of benefits paid and reimbursable by the nonprofit organization together with the benefits charged and chargeable to the reserve account of the nonprofit organization as the result of its prior elective coverage agreement exceed the contributions made by the nonprofit organization and credited to its reserve account pursuant to its prior elective coverage agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Elections for Financing Unemployment Insurance Coverage [801. - 806.]

801.

(a) As used in this section, “nonprofit organization” means any corporation, community chest, fund, or foundation for which services are performed that constitute employment by compulsory coverage under Section 608.

(b) A nonprofit organization may, in lieu of the contributions required of employers, elect to finance its liability for unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits coverage under this division by any method of financing coverage that is permitted under Section 803.

(c) Any election under Section 803 of a method for financing coverage under this section shall, upon the written approval of the director, take effect with respect to services performed from and after the first day of the calendar quarter in which the election is filed with the director, and shall continue in effect for not less than five full calendar years. Thereafter the election under Section 803 may be terminated as of January 1 of any calendar year only if the nonprofit organization, on or before the 31st day of January of that year, has filed with the director a written application for termination. The director may for good cause waive the requirement that a written application for termination shall be filed on or before the 31st day of January. In no event shall the director approve any method of financing coverage by an election under Section 803 that would establish any different method of financing coverage for any calendar quarter where an election for coverage made by a nonprofit organization under Section 702.1 elects a method of financing coverage permitted under Section 803. 

(d) To the extent permitted by federal law, a nonprofit organization which elects reimbursement financing pursuant to this section and which has a favorable reserve account on the date the election takes effect shall not be liable for the reimbursement of benefits pursuant to the election to the extent that the cost of benefits does not exceed the amount in the reserve account. Notwithstanding Section 1029, the reserve account shall not be canceled and the cost of benefits otherwise chargeable to the organization shall be charged to the reserve account until it is exhausted.

(e) Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations shall apply to any matter arising pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 855, Sec. 1.   Effective September 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

801.5.

To the extent permitted by federal law, a nonprofit organization which before the operative date of this section elected reimbursement financing pursuant to Section 801 and which has a favorable reserve account on the operative date of this section shall not be liable for the reimbursement of benefits pursuant to the election to the extent that the cost of benefits does not exceed the amount in the reserve account. Notwithstanding Section 1029, the reserve account shall not be canceled and the cost of benefits otherwise chargeable to the organization shall be charged to the reserve account until it is exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective September 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

(a) The State of California, any other public entity (as defined by Section 605), or any Indian tribe as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code, or any subdivision, subsidiary, or business enterprise wholly owned by that Indian tribe, for which services are performed that do constitute employment under Section 605 may, in lieu of the contributions required of employers, elect to finance its liability for unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits with respect to those services by any method of financing coverage that is permitted under Section 803.

(b) An election under Section 803 for financing coverage under this section shall take effect with respect to services performed from
 and after the first day of the calendar quarter in which the election is filed with the director, and shall continue in effect for not less than two full calendar years, unless the election is canceled by the director pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 803. Thereafter the election under Section 803 may be terminated as of January 1 of any calendar year only if the state or other public entity or Indian tribe, on or before the 31st day of January of that year, has filed with the director a written application for termination. The director may for good cause waive the requirement that a written application for termination shall be filed on or before the 31st day of January. Financing coverage by an election under Section 803 is not valid if it would establish any different method of financing
 coverage for any calendar quarter where an election for coverage has also been made by the state or other public entity or Indian tribe under any provision of Article 4 (commencing with Section 701) of this chapter.

(c) The director may require from the state and other public entity and Indian tribe, including an agent thereof, employment, financial, statistical, or other information and reports, properly verified, as may be deemed necessary by the director to carry out his or her duties under this division, which shall be filed with the director at the time and in the manner prescribed by him or her.

(d) The director may tabulate and publish information obtained pursuant to this section in statistical form and may divulge the name of the state or other public entity or Indian tribe.

(e) The state and other public
 entity and Indian tribe, including an agent thereof, shall keep any work records as may be prescribed by the director for the proper administration of this division.

(f) Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations apply to any matter arising pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 117, Sec. 3.   (AB 1695)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

(a) As used in this section, “entity” means an employing unit that is authorized by Article 4 (commencing with Section 701) or by Section 801 or 802 to elect a method of financing coverage permitted by this section.

(b) In lieu of the contributions required of employers, an entity may elect any one of the following:

(1) To pay into the Unemployment Fund the cost of benefits, including extended duration benefits and federal-state extended benefits, paid based on base period wages with respect to employment for the entity and charged to its account in the manner provided by Section 1026, pursuant to authorized regulations that shall prescribe the rate or amount,
 time, manner, and method of payment or advance payment or providing a good and sufficient bond to guarantee payment of contributions.

(2) Two or more entities may, pursuant to authorized regulations, file an application with the director for the establishment of a joint account for the purpose of determining the rate of contributions they shall pay into the Unemployment Fund to reimburse the fund for benefits paid with respect to employment for those entities. The members of the joint account may share the cost of benefits, including extended duration benefits and federal-state extended benefits, paid based on the base period wages with respect to employment for those members and charged to the joint account in the manner provided by Section 1026. The director shall prescribe authorized regulations for the establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts, and for the rate or amount, time, manner, and method of payment or advance
 payment or providing a good and sufficient bond to guarantee payment of contributions by the members of joint accounts, on the cost of benefits charged in the manner provided by Section 1026.

(c) Sections 1030, 1031, 1032, and 1032.5, and any provision of this division for the noncharging of benefits to the account of an employer, do not apply to an election under subdivision (b). The cost of benefits charged to an entity under this section shall include, but not be limited to, benefits or payments improperly paid in excess of a weekly benefit amount, or in excess of a maximum benefit amount, or otherwise in excess of the amount that should have been paid, due to any computational or other error of any type by the Employment Development Department or the Department of Benefit Payments, whether or not the error could be anticipated.

(d) The cost of benefits charged to an entity
 under this section shall include credits of benefit overpayments actually collected by the department, unless the department determines that the payment was made because the entity, or an agent of the entity, was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to requests of the department for information relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. The department shall make this determination when the entity or agent fails to respond timely or adequately in two instances relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. This subdivision shall apply to benefit overpayments established on or after October 22, 2013.

(e) In making the payments prescribed by subdivision (b), there shall be paid or credited to the Unemployment Fund, either in advance or by way of reimbursement, as may be determined by the director, any sums he or she estimates the Unemployment Fund will be entitled to receive
 from each entity for each calendar quarter, reduced or increased by any sum by which he or she finds that his or her estimates for any prior calendar quarter were greater or less than the amounts which should have been paid to the fund. The estimates may be made upon the basis of statistical sampling, or any other method as may be determined by the director.

Upon making that determination, the director shall give notice of the determination, pursuant to Section 1206, to the entity. The director may cancel any contributions or portion thereof that he or she finds has been erroneously determined.

The director shall charge to any special fund, that is responsible for the salary of any employee of an entity, the amount determined by the director for which the fund is liable pursuant to this section. The contributions due from the entity shall be paid from the liable special fund, the General Fund, or other liable fund to the
 Unemployment Fund by the Controller or other officer or person responsible for disbursements on behalf of the entity within 30 days of the date of mailing of the director’s notice of determination to the entity. The director for good cause may extend for not to exceed 60 days the time for paying without penalty the amount determined and required to be paid. Contributions are due upon the date of mailing of the notice of determination and are delinquent if not paid on or before the 30th day following the date of mailing of the notice.

(f) An entity that fails to pay the contributions required within the time required shall be liable for interest on the contributions at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code from and after the date of delinquency until paid, and an entity that without good cause fails to pay contributions required within the time required shall pay a
 penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the contributions. If the entity fails to pay the contributions required on or before the delinquency date, the director may assess the entity for the amount required by the notice of determination. This subdivision does not apply to employers electing financing under Section 821, for amounts due after December 31, 1992.

(g) Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, with respect to the assessment of contributions, and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) of Part 1, with respect to the collection of contributions, apply to the assessments provided by this section. Sections 1177 to 1184, inclusive, relating to refunds and overpayments, apply to amounts paid to the Unemployment Fund pursuant to this section. Sections 1222, 1223, 1224, 1241, and 1242 apply to matters arising under this section.

(h) (1) The director may terminate the election of an entity for financing under this section if the entity is delinquent in the payment of advances or reimbursements required by the director under this section. After a termination, the entity may again make an election pursuant to this section, but only if it is not delinquent in the payment of contributions and not delinquent in the payment of advances or reimbursements required by the director under this section.

(2) In the case of an Indian tribe (as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code), the director shall terminate all elections for the tribe and all subdivisions, subsidiaries, and business enterprises wholly owned by that tribe if the tribe or any subdivision, subsidiary, or business enterprise wholly owned by that tribe is more than 90 days delinquent in the payment of contributions, bonds, advances, reimbursements, or applicable penalties or
 interest required under this code, after notice to the tribe. After a termination, the Indian tribe may again make an election pursuant to this section, but only if it is not delinquent in the payment of contributions, bonds, advances, reimbursements, or applicable penalties or interest required under this code.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an entity shall not be liable for that portion of any extended duration benefits or federal-state extended benefits that is reimbursed or reimbursable by the federal government to the State of California.

(j) After the termination of an election under this section, the entity shall remain liable for its proportionate share of the cost of benefits paid and charged to its account in the manner provided by Section 1026, which are based on wages paid for services during the period of the election. That liability may be
 charged against any remaining balance of a prior reserve account used by the entity pursuant to Section 712 or 713. Any portion of the remaining balance shall be included in the reserve account of the entity following a termination of an election under this section which occurs prior to the expiration of a period of three consecutive years commencing with the effective date of the election. For purposes of Section 982, the period of an election under Section 803 shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, be included as a period during which a reserve account has been subject to benefit charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 513.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

803.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, if an entity acquires or succeeds to another entity in any manner, the method of reimbursement financing, in lieu of contributions required of employers, elected by the acquiring entity shall apply to all service performed in the employ of the acquiring entity. The acquiring entity shall be liable for the reimbursement of all benefits chargeable to the entity acquired under any method of reimbursement financing elected by the entity acquired, except that this provision shall not apply to the acquisition of, or succession to, less than a total entity if the remainder of the entity partially acquired or succeeded to remains in existence. “Entity” as used in this section means any entity as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 803.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

803.2.
